Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.020

Authority of director.

In addition to any other duties imposed by law, including RCW 18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director has the following powers and duties:

(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086;

(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;

(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and administration of licensing;

(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for practitioners of body art, body piercing, or tattooing as determined by the department of health;

(5) To maintain the official department record of applicants and licensees;

(6) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all licenses consistent with this chapter;

(7) To ensure that all informational notices produced and mailed by the department regarding statutory and regulatory changes affecting any particular class of licensees are mailed to each licensee in good standing in the affected class whose mailing address on record with the department has not resulted in mail being returned as undeliverable for any reason; and

(8) To make information available to the department of revenue to assist in collecting taxes from persons and businesses required to be licensed under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 412 s 3.]